Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Municipal Loans
§ 4766.
Award of advance.

The Department may award an engineering planning advance, as defined in section 4764 of this title, in an amount determined by standards established by the Department, and pursuant to the following:

for public water supply systems, as defined in subdivision 4752(9) of this title, when it finds the same to be necessary in order to preserve or enhance the quality of water provided to the inhabitants of the municipality, or to alleviate an adverse public health condition, or to allow for orderly development and growth of the municipality, except that no funds may be awarded until the Department determines that the applicant has complied with the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 1676a

, unless such funds are solely for the purpose of determining the effect of the proposed project on agriculture; or

for planning of clean water projects, in order to enable a municipality to comply with water quality standards established under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47.

The Department shall award an advance for engineering planning under this section only when it finds:

that the cost of the project is reasonable for its intended purpose; and

that local funds are not readily available.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. May 12, 2016;

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4767.
Payment of awards.

On receipt of the engineering planning documents and their approval by the Department, the Department shall certify the award to the Commissioner of Finance and Management who shall issue his or her warrant for payment of the award from the construction grant funds available to the Department. The Department may direct the Commissioner of Finance and Management to issue his or her warrant for partial payments of the award upon receipt and approval of portions of the total engineering work to be performed under the advance, together with the recipient’s certification that costs for which reimbursement has been requested have been incurred and paid by the recipient municipality. The recipient shall provide supporting evidence of payment upon the request of the Department. Partial payments shall be made not more frequently than monthly. Interest costs incurred in local short-term borrowing of the engineering planning advance shall be reimbursed as part of the advance.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. May 12, 2016.

§ 4768.
Repayment of advances.

Advances under this subchapter shall be repaid when construction of the facilities or any portion thereof is undertaken. Where a construction grant or loan is authorized by the Department for the project, the amount of the outstanding advances shall be retained from the initial payments of the grant or loan funds. In other instances, if repayment is not made within 60 days upon demand by the Department, the sum shall bear interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum from the date payment is demanded by the Department to the date of payment by the municipality. The Department may approve proportional repayment when construction is initiated on a small portion of the planned project.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. May 12, 2016.

§ 4769.
Loans to hardship municipalities.

Waiver of bond vote. A hardship municipality may receive a loan for an eligible project that includes a loan subsidy of up to $200,000.00 in the form of 100 percent principal forgiveness with no interest or administrative fee from funds authorized in subdivision 4753(a)(3) of this title, subject to the availability of such loan subsidy. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 4755(a)(3) of this title, the loan is not required to be evidenced by a municipal bond up to the amount to be forgiven.

Waiver of reimbursement method required in statute. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4755(b) of this title, loan funds may be disbursed to a hardship municipality for its approved project upon receipt by the Department of eligible project invoices without prior payment by the municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 72

, § E.700.1.